en: E343(i), Monomagnesium phosphate, Magnesiumdihydrogenphosphate, Magnesiumphosphate, monobasic, magnesium phosphate
xx: E343(i)
ar: فوسفات المغنسيوم
bg: E343(i), Мономагнезиев фосфат, Магнезиев дихидрогенфосфат, магнезиев фосфат едноосновен
cs: E343(i), Dihydrogenfosforečnan hořečnatý, Kyselý fosforečnan hořečnatý
da: E343(i), Monomagnesiumphosphat, Magnesiumdihydrogenphosphat, monobasisk magnesiumphosphat
de: E343(i), Monomagnesiumphosphat, Magnesiumdihydrogenphosphat, einbasiges Magnesiumphosphat, Magnesiumphosphat
el: E343(i), Δισοξινο φωσφορικο μαγνησιο, Φωσφορικό μαγνήσιο μονοβασικό
es: E343(i), Fosfato de monomagnesio, Dihidrogenofosfato de magnesio, fosfato monobásico de magnesio, Fosfato de magnesio
et: E343(i), Magneesiumdivesinikfosfaat
fi: E343(i), Monomagnesiumfosfaatti, Magnesiumdivetyfosfaatti, Magnesiumfosfaatti monoemäksinen, Monomagnesiumfosfaattia, Magnesiumdivetyfosfaattia, magnesiumfosfaatti, magnesiumfosfaattia
fr: E343(i), Phosphate monomagnésique, phosphate de magnésium
hu: E343(i), Monomagnézium-foszfát, Magnézium-dihidrogén-foszfát, Magnézium-foszfát egybázisú, Magnézium-foszfát
it: E343(i), Fosfato di magnesio, Diidrogeno fosfato di magnesio, fosfato di magnesio monobasico
lt: E343(i), Monomagnio fosfatas, magnio fosfatas vienbazis
lv: E343(i), Monomagnija fosfāts, Magnija dihidrogēnfosfāts, Vienbāziskais magnija fosfāts
mt: E343(i), Fosfat monomanjeżiku
nl: E343(i), Monomagnesiumfosfaat, Magnesiumdiwaterstoffosfaat, monobasisch magnesiumfosfaat, Magnesiumfosfaat
pl: E343(i), Fosforan monomagnezu, Diwodorofosforan magnezu, fosforan magnezu monozasadowy
pt: E343(i), Fosfato de monomagnési
ro: E343(i), Fosfat monomagnezic, Fosfat diacid de magneziu, Fosfat de magneziu monobazic
ru: E343(i), Дигидроортофосфат магния
sh: E343(i), Magnezijum fosfat
sk: E343(i), Fosforečnan horečnatý
sl: E343(i), Monomagnezijev fosfat, magnezijev dihidrogenfosfat, magnezijev fosfat monobazični
sv: E343(i), Monomagnesiumfosfat, Magnesiumdivätefosfat, Magnesiumfosfat
ta: E343(i), மக்னீசியம் பாசுபேட்டு
zh: E343(i), 磷酸二氢镁

en: E343(ii), Dimagnesium phosphate, Magnesiumhydrogenphosphate, Magnesiumphosphate - dibasic, Dimagnesium orthophosphate, magnesium hydrogen phosphate, dimagnesium phosphate, E343ii, E 343ii, E-343ii, E343 ii
xx: E343(ii)
bg: E343(ii), Димагнезиев фосфат, Магнезиев хидрогенфосфат, магнезиев фосфат двуосновен, димагнезиев ортофосфат
cs: E343(ii), Hydrogenfosforečnan hořečnatý, Orthofosforečnan dihořečnatý
da: E343(ii), Dimagnesiumphosphat, Magnesiumhydrogenphosphat, dibasisk magnesiumphosphat, dimagnesiumorthophosphat
de: E343(ii), Dimagnesiumphosphat, Magnesiumhydrogenphosphat, zweibasiges Magnesiumphosphat, Dimagnesiumorthophosphat
el: E343(ii), Οξινο φωσφορικο μαγνησιο, Φωσφορικό μαγνήσιο διβασικό
es: E343(ii), Fosfato de dimagnesio, Hidrogenofosfato de magnesio, fosfato dibásico de magnesio, ortofosfato de dimagnesio
et: E343(ii), Magneesiumvesinikfosfaat
fi: E343(ii), Dimagnesiumfosfaatti, Magnesiumvetyfosfaatti, Magnesiumfosfaatti kaksiemäksinen, Dimagnesiumortofosfaatti, Dimagnesiumfosfaattia, Magnesiumvetyfosfaattia, Dimagnesiumortofosfaattia
fr: E343(ii), dimagnésium phosphate, Phosphate dimagnésique
hr: E343(ii), dimagnezijev fosfat
hu: E343(ii), Dimagnézium-foszfát, Magnézium-hidrogén-foszfát, Magnézium-foszfát kétbázisú, Dimagnézium-ortofoszfát
it: E343(ii), Fosfato di dimagnesio, Idrogeno fosfato di magnesio, fosfato di magnesio dibasico, ortofosfato bimagnesico
lt: E343(ii), Dimagnio fosfatas, Magnio divandenilio fosfatas, magnio fosfatas dvibazis, dimagnio ortofosfatas
lv: E343(ii), Dimagnija fosfāts, Magnija hidrogēnfosfāts, Divbāziskais magnija fosfāts, Dimagnija ortofosfāts
mt: E343(ii), Fosfat dimanjeżiku, Fosfat idroġenat tal-manjeżju, Fosfat tal-manjeżju dibażiku, Ortofosfat dimanjeżiku
nl: E343(ii), Dimagnesiumfosfaat, Magnesiumwaterstoffosfaat, tweebasisch magnesiumfosfaat, dimagnesiumorthofosfaat
pl: E343(ii), Fosforan dimagnezu, Wodorofosforan magnezu, fosforan magnezu dizasadowy, ortofosforan dimagnezu
pt: E343(ii), Fosfato de dimagnésio, Hidrogenofosfato de magnésio, fosfato dibásico de magnésio, ortofosfato de dimagnésio
ro: E343(ii), Fosfat dimagnezic, Fosfat acid de magneziu, Fosfat de magneziu dibazic, Ortofosfat dimagnezic
ru: E343(ii), гидроортофосфат магния
sh: E343(ii), Dimagnezijum fosfat
sk: E343(ii), Fosforečnan dihorečnatý, Hydrogenfosforečnan horečnatý, fosforečnan horečnatý dvojsýtny, ortofosforečnan dihorečnatý
sl: E343(ii), Dimagnezijev fosfat, magnezijev hidrogenfosfat, magnezijev fosfat dibazični, dimagnezijev ortofosfat
sr: E343(ii), Dimagnezijum fosfat
sv: E343(ii), Dimagnesiumfosfat, Magnesiumvätefosfat
ta: E343(ii), இருமக்னீசியம் பாசுபேட்டு

en: E343(iii), Trimagnesium phosphate
xx: E343(iii)

en: E344, Lecithin citrate
xx: E344
bg: E344, Лецитин цитрат
cs: E344, Lecitin citrát
da: E344, Lecithin citrat
de: E344, Lecithin Citrat
el: E344, Λεκιθίνη κιτρική
es: E344, Citrato de lecitina
et: E344, Letsitiin tsitraat
fi: E344, Lesitiinisitraatti, Lesitiinisitraattia
fr: E344, Citrate de lécithine
hu: E344, Lecitin citrát
it: E344, Citrato di lecitina
lt: E344, Lecitino citratas
lv: E344, Lecitīna citrāts
mt: E344, Ċitrat tal-leċitina
nl: E344, Lecithinecitraat
pl: E344, Cytrynian lecytyny
pt: E344, Citrato de lecitina
ro: E344, Citrat de lecitină
sk: E344, Lecitín citrát
sl: E344, Lecitin citrat
sv: E344, Lecitin citrat

en: E345, Magnesium citrate
xx: E345
bg: E345, Магнезиев цитрат
cs: E345, Citrát hořečnatý
da: E345, Magnesiumcitrat
de: E345, Magnesiumcitrat, Trimagnesiumdicitrat
el: E345, Κιτρικό μαγνήσιο
es: E345, Citrato de magnesio
et: E345, Magneesiumtsitraat
fi: E345, Magnesiumsitraatti
fr: E345, Citrate de magnésium
hu: E345, Magnézium-citrát
it: E345, Citrato di magnesio
lt: E345, Magnio citratas
lv: E345, Magnija citrāts
mt: E345, Ċitrat tal-magneżju
nl: E345, Magnesiumcitraat
pl: E345, Cytrynian magnezu
pt: E345, Citrato de magnésio
ro: E345, Citrat de magneziu
sk: E345, Citrát horečnatý
sl: E345, Citrat magnezija
sv: E345, Magnesiumcitrat

en: E349, ammonium malate
xx: E349
ar: E349, مالات الأمونيوم
az: E349, Ammonium malat
bg: E349, Амониев малат
ca: E349, Malat d'amoni
cs: E349, Jablečnan amonný
da: E349, Ammoniummalat
de: E349, Ammoniummalat
el: E349, Μηλικό αμμώνιο
eo: E349, Amonia malato
es: E349, Malato de amonio, Malato amónico, E 349
et: E349, Ammooniummalaat
fi: E349, Ammoniummalaatti, Ammoniummalaattia
fr: E349, Malate d'ammonium
hu: E349, Ammónium-malát
it: E349, Malato di ammonio
ja: E349, リンゴ酸アンモニウム
ko: E349, 말산 암모늄
lt: E349, Amonio malatas
lv: E349, Amonija malāts
mt: E349, Malat tal-ammonju
nl: E349, Ammoniummalaat
pl: E349, Jabłczan amonu
pt: E349, Malato de amónio
ro: E349, Malat de amoniu
ru: E349, Малат аммония
sk: E349, Jablčnan amónny
sl: E349, Amonijev malat
sv: E349, Ammoniummalat
zh: E349, 苹果酸铵

en: E350, Sodium malates
xx: E350
ar: E350, مالات الصوديوم
az: E350, Natrium malatlar
bg: E350, Натриеви малати
ca: E350, Malat de sodi
cs: E350, Jablečnan sodný
da: E350, Natriummalater
de: E350, Natriummalate
el: E350, άλατα του μηλικού οξέος με νάτριο
es: E350, malatos de sodio
et: E350, Naatriummalaadid
fi: E350, natriummalaatit
fr: E350, malates de sodium, malates
he: E350, מלאטים של נתרן
hi: E350, सोडियम मैलेट
hr: E350, Natrijevi malati
hu: E350, Nátrium-malátok
id: E350, Natrium malat
it: E350, malati di sodio
ja: E350, リンゴ酸ナトリウム
ko: E350, 나트륨 말산염
lt: E350, natrio malatai
lv: E350, Nātrija malāti
mk: E350, Натриум малати
mt: E350, Malati tas-sodju
nl: E350, natriummalaten
pl: E350, Jabłczany sodu
pt: E350, malatos de sódio
ro: E350, Malați de sodiu
ru: E350, Малаты натрия
sk: E350, jablčnany sodné
sl: E350, Natrijevi malati
sr: E350, Натријум малати
sv: E350, natriummalater
tr: E350, Sodyum malatlar
uk: E350, Малати натрію
zh: E350, 苹果酸钠

en: E350(i), Sodium malate
xx: E350(i)
ar: E350(i), مالات صوديوم
bg: E350(i), Натриев малат
ca: E350(i), Malat sòdic
cs: E350(i), Jablečnan disodný
da: E350(i), Natriummalat, Dinatriummalat
de: E350(i), Natriummalat
el: E350(i), Μηλικο νατριο
eo: E350(i), Natria malikato
es: E350(i), Malato sódico, Malato de sodio
et: E350(i), Naatriummalaat
fa: E350(i), سدیم مالات
fi: E350(i), Natriummalaatti, Natriummalaattia
fr: E350(i), Malate de sodium
hr: E350(i), Natrijev malat
hu: E350(i), Nátrium-malát
it: E350(i), Malato di sodio, Sale sodico dell'acido malico
lt: E350(i), Natrio malatas
lv: E350(i), Nātrija malāts
mt: E350(i), Malat tas-sodju
nl: E350(i), Natriummalaat
pl: E350(i), Jabłczan sodu
pt: E350(i), Malato de sódio
ro: E350(i), Malat de sodiu
sh: E350(i), Natrijum malat
sk: E350(i), Jablčnan sodný
sl: E350(i), Natrijev malat
sr: E350(i), Natrijum malat
sv: E350(i), Natriummalat
ta: E350(i), சோடியம் மேலேட்டு

en: E350(ii), Sodium hydrogen malate
xx: E350(ii)
bg: E350(ii), Натриев хидроген малат
cs: E350(ii), Jablečnan monosodný
da: E350(ii), Natriumhydrogenmalat
de: E350(ii), Natriumhydrogenmalat
el: E350(ii), Οξινο μηλικο νατριο
es: E350(ii), Malato ácido de sodio
et: E350(ii), Naatriumvesinikmalaat
fi: E350(ii), Natriumvetymalaatti, Natriumvetymalaattia
fr: E350(ii), Malate acide de sodium
hu: E350(ii), Nátrium-hidrogén-malát
it: E350(ii), Malato acido di sodio
lt: E350(ii), Natrio vandenilio malatas
lv: E350(ii), Nātrija hidrogēnmalāts
mt: E350(ii), Malat idroġenat tas-sodju
nl: E350(ii), Natriumwaterstofmalaat
pl: E350(ii), Wodorojabłczan sodu
pt: E350(ii), Hidrogenomalato de sódio
ro: E350(ii), Malat acid de sodiu
sk: E350(ii), Hydrogenjablčnan sodný
sl: E350(ii), Natrijev hidrogenmalat
sv: E350(ii), Natriumvätemalat

en: E351, Potassium malate
xx: E351
bg: E351, Калиев малат
ca: E351, Malat de potassi
cs: E351, Jablečnan draselný
da: E351, Kaliummalat
de: E351, Kaliummalat, Kaliummalate
el: E351, Μηλικο καλιο
es: E351, Malato potásico, Malato de potasio
et: E351, Kaaliummalaat
fi: E351, Kaliummalaatti, Kaliummalaattia
fr: E351, Malate de potassium, Malate acide de potassium
hu: E351, Kálium-malát
it: E351, Malato di potassio
lt: E351, Kalio malatas
lv: E351, Kālija malāts
mt: E351, Malat tal-potassju
nl: E351, Kaliummalaat
pl: E351, Jabłczan potasu
pt: E351, Malato de potássio
ro: E351, Malat de potasiu
sk: E351, Jablčnan draselný
sl: E351, Kalijev malat
sv: E351, Kaliummalat

en: E351(i), Potassium hydrogen malate
xx: E351(i)

en: E351(ii)
xx: E351(ii)

en: E352, Calcium malates
xx: E352
bg: E352, Калциеви малати
ca: E352, Malats de calci
cs: E352, Vápenaté maláty
da: E352, Calciummalater
de: E352, Calciummalaten, Calciummalate
el: E352, Μηλικά ασβεστίου
es: E352, Malatos de calcio
et: E352, Kaltsiummalaadid
fi: E352, Kalsiummalaatit
fr: E352, Malates de calcium
hu: E352, Kalcium-malátok
it: E352, Malati di calcio
lt: E352, Kalcio malatai
lv: E352, Kalcija malāti
mt: E352, Malati tal-kalċju
nl: E352, Calciummalaten
pl: E352, Jabłczany wapnia
pt: E352, Malatos de cálcio
ro: E352, Malate de calciu
sk: E352, Vápenaté maláty
sl: E352, Kalcijevi malati
sv: E352, Kalciummalater

en: E352(i), Calcium malate
xx: E352(i)
bg: E352(i), Калциев малат
cs: E352(i), Jablečnan vápenatý
da: E352(i), Calciummalat
de: E352(i), Calciummalat
el: E352(i), Μηλικο ασβεστιο
es: E352(i), Malato cálcico
et: E352(i), Kaltsiummalaat
fi: E352(i), Kalsiummalaatti, Kalsiummalaattia
fr: E352(i), Malate de calcium
hu: E352(i), Kalcium-malát
it: E352(i), Malato di calcio
lt: E352(i), Kalcio malatas
lv: E352(i), Kalcija malāts
mt: E352(i), Malat tal-kalċju
nl: E352(i), Calciummalaat
pl: E352(i), Jabłczan wapnia
pt: E352(i), Malato de cálcio
ro: E352(i), Malat de calciu
sk: E352(i), Jablčnan vápenatý
sl: E352(i), Kalcijev malat
sv: E352(i), Kalciummalat

en: E352(ii), Calcium hydrogen malate
xx: E352(ii)
bg: E352(ii), Калциев хидроген малат
cs: E352(ii), Hydrogenjablečnan vápenatý
da: E352(ii), Calciumhydrogenmalat
de: E352(ii), Calciumhydrogenmalat
el: E352(ii), Οξινο μηλικο ασβεστιο
es: E352(ii), Malato ácido de calcio
et: E352(ii), Kaltsiumvesinikmalaat
fi: E352(ii), Kalsiumvetymalaatti, Kalsiumvetymalaattia
fr: E352(ii), Malate acide de calcium
hu: E352(ii), Kalcium-hidrogén-malát
it: E352(ii), Malato acido di calcio
lt: E352(ii), Kalcio vandenilio malatas
lv: E352(ii), Kalcija hidrogēnmalāts
mt: E352(ii), Malat idroġenat tal-kalċju
nl: E352(ii), Calciumwaterstofmalaat
pl: E352(ii), Wodorojabłczan wapnia
pt: E352(ii), Hidrogenomalato de cálcio
ro: E352(ii), Malat acid de calciu
sk: E352(ii), Hydrogenjablčnan vápenatý
sl: E352(ii), Kalcijev hidrogenmalat
sv: E352(ii), Kalciumvätemalat

en: E353, Metatartaric acid
xx: E353
bg: E353, Метавинена киселина
ca: E353, Àcid metatartàric, acid metatartaric
cs: E353, Metatartaric acid
da: E353, Metavinsyre
de: E353, Metaweinsäure
el: E353, Μετατρυγικο οξυ
es: E353, Ácido metatartárico
et: E353, Metatartaric acid
fi: E353, Metaviinihappo, Metaviinihappoa
fr: E353, Acide métatartrique
hu: E353, Metaborkősav
it: E353, Acido metatartarico
lt: E353, Metavyno rūgštis
lv: E353, Metavīnskābe
mt: E353, Aċidu metatartariku
nl: E353, Metawijnsteenzuur
pl: E353, Kwas metawinowy
pt: E353, Ácido metatartárico
ro: E353, Acid metatartric
sk: E353, Kyselina metavínna
sl: E353, Metavinska kislina
sv: E353, Metavinsyra

en: E354, Calcium tartrate
xx: E354
bg: E354, Калциев тартарат
ca: E354, Tartrat de calci
cs: E354, Vinan vápenatý, Kalcium-tartarát, vápenatá sůl kyseliny vinné
da: E354, Calciumtartrat
de: E354, Calciumtartrat
el: E354, Τρυγικο ασβεστιο
es: E354, Tartrato de calcio
et: E354, Kaltsiumtartraat
fi: E354, Kalsiumtartraatti, Kalsiumtartraattia
fr: E354, Tartrate de calcium
hu: E354, Kalcium-tartarát
it: E354, Tartrato di calcio
lt: E354, Kalcio tartratas
lv: E354, Kalcija tartrāts
mt: E354, Tartrat tal-kalċju
nl: E354, Calciumtartraat
pl: E354, Winian wapnia
pt: E354, Tartarato de cálcio
ro: E354, Tartrat de calciu
sk: E354, Vínan vápenatý
sl: E354, Kalcijev tartrat
sv: E354, Kalciumtartrat

en: E355, Adipic acid, Hexanedioic acid
xx: E355
bg: E355, Адипинова киселина, Хександиолова киселина
ca: E355, Àcid adípic, acid adipic
cs: E355, Kyselina adipová, Kyselina hexandiová, Adipát
da: E355, Adipinsyre, Hexandisyre
de: E355, Adipinsäure, Hexandisäure, Hexan-1\,6-disäure, Adipate
el: E355, Αδιπικο οξυ, Εξανοδικαρβονικό οξύ
es: E355, Ácido adípico, Ácido hexanodioico, Adipato
et: E355, Adipiinhape, Heksaandihape, Adiphape
fi: E355, Adipiinihappo, Heksaanidikarbonihappo, Heksaanidihappo
fr: E355, Acide adipique, Acide hexanedioïque
hu: E355, Adipinsav, Hexándisav
it: E355, Acido adipico, Acido esandioico
lt: E355, Adipo rūgštis, Heksano dirūgštis, Adipino rūgštis
lv: E355, Adipīnskābe, Heksāndiolskābe, Heksāndiskābe, Adipināts
mt: E355, Aċidu adipiku, Aċidu eżandiojku
nl: E355, Adipinezuur, Hexaandizuur
pl: E355, Kwas adypinowy, Kwas heksanodiowy
pt: E355, Ácido adípico, Ácido hexanodióico, Adipato
ro: E355, Acid adipic, Acid hexandioic
sk: E355, Kyselina adipová, Kyselina hexándiová
sl: E355, Adipinska kislina, heksandiojska kislina
sv: E355, Adipinsyra, Hexandisyra, Hexandikarbonylsyra

en: E356, Sodium adipate
xx: E356
bg: E356, Натриев адипат
ca: E356, Adipat de sodi
cs: E356, Adipan sodný synonyma, natrium adipát
da: E356, Natriumadipat
de: E356, Natriumadipat
el: E356, Αδιπικο νατριο
es: E356, Adipato de sodio, Adipato sódico, E 356
et: E356, Naatriumadipaat
fi: E356, Natriumadipaatti, Natriumadipaattia
fr: E356, Adipate de sodium
hu: E356, Nátrium-adipát
it: E356, Adipato di sodio
lt: E356, Natrio adipatas
lv: E356, Nātrija adipināts
mt: E356, Adipat tas-sodju
nl: E356, Natriumadipaat
pl: E356, Adypinian sodu
pt: E356, Adipato de sódio, Hexanodioato de sódio
ro: E356, Adipat de sodiu
sk: E356, Adipan sodný
sl: E356, Natrijev adipat
sv: E356, Natriumadipat, E 356

en: E357, Potassium adipate
xx: E357
bg: E357, Калиев адипат
ca: E357, Adipat de potassi
cs: E357, Adipan draselný synonyma, kalium-adipát
da: E357, Kaliumadipat
de: E357, Kaliumadipat
el: E357, Αδιπικο καλιο
es: E357, Adipato de potasio, Adipato potásico
et: E357, Kaaliumadipaat
fi: E357, Kaliumadipaatti, Kaliumadipaattia
fr: E357, Adipate de potassium
hu: E357, Kálium-adipát
it: E357, Adipato di potassio
lt: E357, Kalio adipatas
lv: E357, Kālija adipināts
mt: E357, Adipat tal-potassju
nl: E357, Kaliumadipaat
pl: E357, Adypinian potasu
pt: E357, Adipato de potássio
ro: E357, Adipat de potasiu
sk: E357, Adipan draselný
sl: E357, Kalijev adipat
sv: E357, Kaliumadipat